Massachusetts, session 194th, H4752.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The city of Revere may: (i) issue citations; (ii) establish appeal and hearing
processes for the citations; (iii) file real estate liens to collect unpaid fines, penalties or
assessments from the citations; and (iv) avail itself of any and all relevant enforcement or
procedural provisions provided in chapter 40U of the General Laws for violations of the rooming
house ordinance of the city.
SECTION 2. This act shall apply only to those violations that are separate and distinct
from violations of the health, sanitary, housing, fire, building, plumbing or electrical code of the
city of Revere or the commonwealth.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1